Utah statutes.
53B-8-104.   Nonresident partial tuition scholarships.
(1)  The board may grant a scholarship for partial waiver of the nonresident
portion of total tuition charged by public institutions of higher education to
nonresident undergraduate students, subject to the limitations provided in
this section, if the board determines that the scholarship will:
(a)  promote mutually beneficial cooperation between Utah communities and
nearby communities in states adjacent to Utah;
(b)  contribute to the quality and desirable cultural diversity of educational
programs in Utah institutions;
(c)  assist in maintaining an adequate level of service and related cost-
effectiveness of auxiliary operations in Utah institutions of higher
education; and
(d)  promote enrollment of nonresident students with high academic aptitudes.
(2)  The board shall establish policy guidelines for the administration by
institutions of higher education of any partial tuition scholarships
authorized under this section, for evaluating applicants for those
scholarships, and for reporting the results of the scholarship program
authorized by this section.
(3)  The policy guidelines promulgated by the board under Subsection (2) shall
include the following provisions:
(a)  the amount of the approved scholarship may not be more than 1/2 of the
differential tuition charged to nonresident students for an equal number of
credit hours of instruction;
(b)  a nonresident partial tuition scholarship may be awarded initially only
to a nonresident undergraduate student who has not previously been enrolled in
a college or university in Utah and who has enrolled full time for 10 or more
credit hours, whose legal domicile is within approximately 100 highway miles
of the Utah system of higher education institution at which the recipient
wishes to enroll or such distance that the regents may establish for any
institution;
(c)  the total number of nonresident partial tuition scholarships granted may
not exceed a total of 600 such scholarships in effect at any one time; and
(d)  the board shall determine eligibility for nonresident partial tuition
scholarships on the basis of program availability at an institution and on a
competitive basis, using quantifiable measurements such as grade point
averages and results of test scores.
(4)  The board shall submit an annual report and financial analysis of the
effects of offering nonresident partial tuition scholarships authorized under
this section to the Legislature as part of its budget recommendations for the
system of higher education.
